Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-415, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-415. A. The provisions of the Trafficking in Illegal
Drugs Act shall apply to persons convicted of violations with
respect to the following substances:
1. Marijuana;
2. Cocaine or coca leaves;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Heroin;
4. Amphetamine or methamphetamine;
5. Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD);
6. Phencyclidine (PCP);
7. Cocaine base, commonly known as "crack" or "rock";
8. 3,4-Methylenedioxy methamphetamine, commonly known as
"ecstasy" or MDMA;
9. Morphine;
10. Oxycodone;
11. Hydrocodone;
12. Benzodiazepine; or
13. Fentanyl and its analogs and derivatives.
B. Except as otherwise authorized by the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act, it shall be unlawful for any person to:
1. Knowingly distribute, manufacture, bring into this state or
possess a controlled substance specified in subsection A of this
section in the quantities specified in subsection C of this section;
2. Possess any controlled substance with the intent to
manufacture a controlled substance specified in subsection A of this
section in quantities specified in subsection C of this section; or
3. Use or solicit the use of services of a person less than
eighteen (18) years of age to distribute or manufacture a controlled
dangerous substance specified in subsection A of this section in
quantities specified in subsection C of this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Violation of this section shall be known as "trafficking in
illegal drugs". Separate types of controlled substances described
in subsection A of this section when possessed at the same time in
violation of any provision of this section shall constitute a
separate offense for each substance.
Any person who commits the conduct described in paragraph 1, 2
or 3 of this subsection and represents the quantity of the
controlled substance to be an amount described in subsection C of
this section shall be punished under the provisions appropriate for
the amount of controlled substance represented, regardless of the
actual amount.
C. In the case of a violation of the provisions of subsection B
of this section, involving:
1. Marijuana:
a. twenty-five Twenty-five (25) pounds or more of a
mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
marijuana shall be punishable by a fine of not less
than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and not
more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00),
or
b. one thousand (1,000) pounds or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of marijuana
shall be deemed aggravated trafficking punishable by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($100,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($500,000.00);
2. Cocaine, coca leaves or cocaine base:
a. twenty-eight (28) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine,
coca leaves or cocaine base shall be punishable by a
fine of not less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) and not more than One Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($100,000.00),
b. three hundred (300) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine,
coca leaves or cocaine base shall be punishable by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($500,000.00), or
c. four hundred fifty (450) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine,
coca leaves or cocaine base shall be deemed aggravated
trafficking punishable by a fine of not less than One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and not more
than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);
3. Heroin:
a. ten (10) grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of heroin shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

punishable by a fine of not less than Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and not more than Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or
b. twenty-eight (28) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of heroin
shall be deemed aggravated trafficking punishable by a
fine of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($500,000.00);
4. Amphetamine or methamphetamine:
a. twenty (20) grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of amphetamine or
methamphetamine shall be punishable by a fine of not
less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)
and not more than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars
($200,000.00),
b. two hundred (200) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of
amphetamine or methamphetamine shall be punishable by
a fine of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($500,000.00), or
c. four hundred fifty (450) grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

amphetamine or methamphetamine shall be deemed
aggravated trafficking punishable by a fine of not
less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) and not
more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);
5. Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD):
a. one (1) gram or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid
diethylamide (LSD) shall be trafficking punishable by
a term of imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections not to exceed twenty (20)
years and by a fine of not less than Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($50,000.00) and not more than One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or
b. ten (10) grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid
diethylamide (LSD) shall be aggravated trafficking
punishable by a term of imprisonment in the custody of
the Department of Corrections of not less than two (2)
years nor more than life and by a fine of not less
than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and
not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($250,000.00);
6. Phencyclidine (PCP):

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. twenty (20) grams or more of a substance containing a
mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
phencyclidine (PCP) shall be trafficking punishable by
a term of imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections not to exceed twenty (20)
years and by a fine of not less than Twenty Thousand
Dollars ($20,000.00) and not more than Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($50,000.00), or
b. one hundred fifty (150) grams or more of a substance
containing a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP) shall be
aggravated trafficking punishable by a term of
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections of not less than two (2) years nor more
than life and by a fine of not less than Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) and not more than Two
Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00);
7. Methylenedioxy methamphetamine:
a. thirty (30) tablets or ten (10) grams of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of 3,4-
Methylenedioxy methamphetamine shall be trafficking
punishable by a term of imprisonment in the custody of
the Department of Corrections not to exceed twenty
(20) years and by a fine of not less than Twenty-five
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and not more than One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or
b. one hundred (100) tablets or thirty (30) grams of a
mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
3,4-Methylenedioxy methamphetamine shall be deemed
aggravated trafficking punishable by a term of
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections of not less than two (2) years nor more
than life by a fine of not less than One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and not more than Five
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);
8. Morphine: One thousand (1,000) grams or more of a mixture
containing a detectable amount of morphine shall be trafficking
punishable by a term of imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections not to exceed twenty (20) years and by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and
not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);
9. Oxycodone: Four hundred (400) grams or more of a mixture
containing a detectable amount of oxycodone shall be trafficking
punishable by a term of imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections not to exceed twenty (20) years and by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and
not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. Hydrocodone: Three thousand seven hundred fifty (3,750)
grams or more of a mixture containing a detectable amount of
hydrocodone shall be trafficking punishable by a term of
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not to
exceed twenty (20) years and by a fine of not less than One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00);
11. Benzodiazepine: Five hundred (500) grams or more of a
mixture containing a detectable amount of benzodiazepine shall be
trafficking punishable by a term of imprisonment not to exceed
twenty (20) years and by a fine of not less than One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) and not more than Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00); and
12. Fentanyl and its analogs and derivatives:
a. one (1) gram or more of a mixture containing fentanyl
or carfentanil, or any fentanyl analogs or derivatives
shall be trafficking punishable by a term of
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not to exceed twenty (20) years and by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) and not more than Two Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), or
b. five (5) grams or more of a mixture containing
fentanyl or carfentanil, or any fentanyl analogs or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

derivatives shall be aggravated trafficking punishable
by a term of imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections of not less than two (2)
years nor more than life and by a fine of not less
than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00)
and not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($500,000.00).
D. Any person who violates the provisions of this section with
respect to marijuana, cocaine, coca leaves, cocaine base, heroin,
amphetamine or methamphetamine in a quantity specified in paragraphs
1, 2, 3 and 4 of subsection C of this section shall, in addition to
any fines specified by this section, be punishable by a term of
imprisonment as follows:
1. For trafficking, a first violation of this section, a term
of imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not
to exceed twenty (20) years;
2. For trafficking, a second violation of this section, a term
of imprisonment in the Department of Corrections of not less than
four (4) years nor more than life, for which the person shall serve
fifty percent (50%) of the sentence before being eligible for parole
consideration;
3. For trafficking, a third or subsequent violation of this
section, a term of imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections of not less than twenty (20) years nor more than life,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of w hich the person shall serve fifty percent (50%) of the sentence
before being eligible for parole consideration.
Persons convicted of trafficking shall not be eligible for
earned credits or any other type of credits which have the effect of
reducing the length of sentence to less than fifty percent (50%) of
the sentence imposed; and
If the person is convicted of aggravated trafficking, the person
shall serve eighty-five percent (85%) of such sentence before being
eligible for parole consideration.
E. The penalties specified in subsections C and D of this
section are subject to the enhancements enumerated in subsections E
and F of Section 2-401 of this title.
F. Any person convicted of any offense described in this
section shall, in addition to any fine imposed, pay a special
assessment trauma-care fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to be
deposited into the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in
Section 1-2530.9 of this title and the assessment pursuant to
Section 2-503.2 of this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 420, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 420), is amended to read as follows:
Section 420. A. A person in possession of a state-issued
medical marijuana patient license shall be able to:
1. Consume marijuana legally;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Legally possess up to three (3) ounces or eighty-four and
nine-tenths (84.9) grams of marijuana on their person;
3. Legally possess six mature marijuana plants and the
harvested marijuana therefrom;
4. Legally possess six seedling plants;
5. Legally possess one (1) ounce or twenty-eight and three
tenths (28.3) grams of concentrated marijuana;
6. Legally possess seventy-two (72) ounces or two thousand
thirty-seven and six-tenths (2037.6) grams of edible marijuana;
7. Legally possess up to eight (8) ounces or two hundred
twenty-six and four-tenths (226.4) grams of marijuana in their
residence; and
8. Legally possess seventy-two (72) ounces of topical
marijuana.
B. Possession of up to one and one-half (1.5) ounces or forty-
two and forty-five one-hundredths (42.45) grams of marijuana by
persons who can state a medical condition at the time of the stop
and issuance of a written citation or arrest, but are not in
possession of a state-issued medical marijuana patient license,
shall constitute a misdemeanor offense punishable by a fine not to
exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) and shall not be subject to
imprisonment for the offense. Any law enforcement officer who comes
in contact with a person in violation of this subsection and who is
satisfied as to the identity of the person, as well as any other
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pert inent information the law enforcement officer deems necessary,
shall issue to the person a written citation containing a notice to
answer the charge against the person in the appropriate court. Upon
receiving the written promise of the alleged violator to answer as
specified in the citation, the law enforcement officer shall release
the person upon personal recognizance unless there has been a
violation of another provision of law.
C. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall be
established which shall receive applications for medical marijuana
patient and caregiver license recipients, dispensaries, growers, and
processors within sixty (60) days of the passage of this initiative.
D. The Authority shall, within thirty (30) days of passage of
this initiative, make available on its website, in an easy-to-find
location, an application for a medical marijuana patient license.
The license shall be valid for two (2) years. The biannual
application fee shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for individuals on Medicaid, Medicare or
SoonerCare. The methods of payment shall be provided on the website
of the Authority. Reprints of the medical marijuana patient license
shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00).
E. A short-term medical marijuana patient license application
shall also be made available on the website of the Authority. A
short-term medical marijuana patient license shall be granted to any
applicant who can meet the requirements for a two-year medical
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mari juana patient license, but whose physician recommendation for
medical marijuana is only valid for sixty (60) days. Short-term
medical marijuana patient licenses shall be issued for sixty (60)
days. The fee for a short-term medical marijuana patient license,
reprints of the short-term medical marijuana patient license, and
the procedure for extending or renewing the license shall be
determined by the Executive Director of the Authority.
F. A temporary medical marijuana patient license application
shall also be made available on the website of the Authority for
residents of other states. Temporary medical marijuana patient
licenses shall be granted to any medical marijuana license holders
from other states, provided that such states have state-regulated
medical marijuana programs, and applicants can prove they are
members of such programs. Temporary medical marijuana patient
licenses shall be issued for thirty (30) days. The cost for a
temporary license shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). Renewal
shall be granted with resubmission of a new application. No
additional criteria shall be required. Reprints of the temporary
medical marijuana patient license shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00).
G. Medical marijuana patient license applicants shall submit
their applications to the Authority for approval. The applicant
shall be a resident of this state and shall prove residency by a
valid driver license, utility bills, or other accepted methods.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

H. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana patient
license application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and
mail the approval, rejection, or denial letter stating any reasons
for rejection, to the applicant within fourteen (14) business days
of receipt of the application. Approved applicants shall be issued
a medical marijuana patient license which shall act as proof of his
or her approved status. Applications may only be rejected or denied
based on the applicant not meeting stated criteria or improper
completion of the application.
I. The Authority shall make available, both on its website and
through a telephone verification system, an easy method to validate
the authenticity of the medical marijuana patient license by the
unique twenty-four-character identification number.
J. The Authority shall ensure that all medical marijuana
patient and caregiver records and information are sealed to protect
the privacy of medical marijuana patient license applicants.
K. A caregiver license shall be made available for qualified
caregivers of a medical marijuana patient license holder who is
homebound. As provided in Section 427.11 of this title, the
caregiver license shall provide the caregiver the same rights as the
medical marijuana patient licensee including the ability to possess
marijuana, marijuana products and mature and immature plants or
cultivated medical marijuana pursuant to the Oklahoma Medical
Marijuana and Patient Protection Act, but excluding the ability to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

use marijuana or marijuana products unless the caregiver has a
medical marijuana patient license. Applicants for a caregiver
license shall submit proof of the license status and homebound
status of the medical marijuana patient and proof that the applicant
is the designee of the medical marijuana patient. The applicant
shall also submit proof that he or she is eighteen (18) years of age
or older and proof of his or her state residency. This shall be the
only criteria for a caregiver license. A licensed caregiver shall
not cultivate medical marijuana for more than five medical marijuana
patient licensees and shall not charge a medical marijuana patient
licensee for cultivating medical marijuana in excess of the actual
costs incurred in cultivating the medical marijuana.
L. All applicants for a medical marijuana patient license shall
be eighteen (18) years of age or older. A special exception shall
be granted to an applicant under the age of eighteen (18); however,
these applications shall be signed by two physicians and the parent
or legal guardian of the applicant.
M. All applications for a medical marijuana patient license
shall be signed by an Oklahoma physician licensed by and in good
standing with the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision,
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, or the Board of Podiatric
Medical Examiners. There are no qualifying conditions. A medical
marijuana patient license shall be recommended according to the
accepted standards a reasonable and prudent physician would follow
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

when recommending or approving any medication. No physician may be
unduly stigmatized, penalized, subjected to discipline, sanctioned,
reprimanded or harassed for signing a medical marijuana patient
license application; provided, the physician acted in accordance
with the provisions of this subsection and all other rules governing
the medical license of the physician in this state.
N. Counties and cities may enact medical marijuana guidelines
allowing medical marijuana patient license holders or caregiver
license holders to exceed the state limits set forth in subsection A
of this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
April 22, 2025 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1163 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)